Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
A. Records

§ 17-19-1601.
Corporate records.

A corporation shall keep as permanent records minutes of all meetings of its members and board of directors, a record of all actions taken by the members or directors without a meeting, and a record of all actions taken by committees of the board of directors as authorized by W.S. 17-19-825(d).

A corporation shall maintain appropriate accounting records.

A corporation or its agent shall maintain a record of its members in a form that permits preparation of a list of the name and address of all members, in alphabetical order by class, showing the number of votes each member is entitled to cast.

A corporation shall maintain its records in written form or in another form capable of conversion into written form within a reasonable time.

A corporation shall keep a copy of the following records at its principal office:

Its articles or restated articles of incorporation and all amendments to them currently in effect;

Its bylaws or restated bylaws and all amendments to them currently in effect;

Resolutions adopted by its board of directors relating to the characteristics, qualifications, rights, limitations and obligations of members or any class or category of members;

The minutes of all meetings of members and records of all actions approved by the members for the past three (3) years;

All written communications to members generally within the past three (3) years, including the financial statements furnished for the past three (3) years under W.S.

17-19-1620

;

A list of the names and addresses of its current directors and officers; and

Its most recent annual report delivered to the secretary of state under W.S.

17-19-1630

.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Applied in

Clark v. Ryan Park Prop. & Homeowners Ass'n, 2014
WY 169,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Dec. 30, 2014).

§ 17-19-1602.
Inspection of records by members.

Subject to subsection (e) of this section and W.S. 17-19-1603(c), a member is entitled to inspect and copy, at a reasonable time and location specified by the corporation, any of the records of the corporation described in W.S. 17-19-1601(e) if the member gives the corporation written notice or a written demand at least five (5) business days before the date on which the member wishes to inspect and copy.

Subject to subsection (e) of this section, a member is entitled to inspect and copy, at a reasonable time and reasonable location specified by the corporation, any of the following records of the corporation if the member meets the requirements of subsection (c) of this section and gives the corporation written notice at least five (5) business days before the date on which the member wishes to inspect and copy:

Excerpts from any records required to be maintained under W.S. 17-19-1601(a), to the extent not subject to inspection under W.S. 17-19-1602(a);

Accounting records of the corporation; and

Subject to W.S.

17-19-1605

, the membership list.

A member may inspect and copy the records identified in subsection (b) of this section only if:

The member’s demand is made in good faith and for a proper purpose;

The member describes with reasonable particularity the purpose and the records the member desires to inspect; and

The records are directly connected with this purpose.

This section does not affect:

The right of a member to inspect records under W.S.

17-19-720

or, if the member is in litigation with the corporation, to the same extent as any other litigant; or

The power of a court, independently of this act, to compel the production of corporate records for examination.

The articles or bylaws of a religious corporation may limit or abolish the right of a member under this section to inspect and copy any corporate record.

Nothing in this act pertaining to access to corporate records shall operate to violate the confidentiality of records, including patient files, personnel matters, disciplinary files, individual member files, client files, medical files or other files which are generally considered by law to be confidential or privileged.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsections (d)(ii) and (f), see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxvii).

§ 17-19-1603.
Scope of inspection rights.

A member’s agent or attorney has the same inspection and copying rights as the member the agent or attorney represents.

The right to copy records under W.S.

17-19-1602

includes, if reasonable, the right to receive copies made by photographic, xerographic or other means.

The corporation may impose a reasonable charge, covering the costs of labor and material, for copies of any documents provided to the member. The charge may not exceed the estimated cost of production or reproduction of the records.

The corporation may comply with a member’s demand to inspect the record of members under W.S. 17-19-1602(b)(iii) by providing the member with a list of its members that was compiled no earlier than the date of the member’s demand.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-1604.
Court-ordered inspection.

If a corporation does not allow a member who complies with W.S. 17-19-1602(a) to inspect and copy any records required by that subsection to be available for inspection, the district court in the county where the corporations’ principal office, or, if none in this state, its registered office, is located may summarily order inspection and copying of the records demanded at the corporation’s expense upon application of the member.

If a corporation does not within a reasonable time allow a member to inspect and copy any other record, the member who complies with W.S. 17-19-1602(b) and (c) may apply to the district court in the county where the corporation’s principal office, or, if none in this state, its registered office, is located for an order to permit inspection and copying of the records demanded. The court shall dispose of an application under this subsection on an expedited basis.

If the court orders inspection and copying of the records demanded, it shall also order the corporation to pay the member’s costs, including reasonable counsel fees, incurred to obtain the order unless the corporation proves that it refused inspection in good faith because it had a reasonable basis for doubt about the right of the member to inspect the records demanded.

If the court orders inspection and copying of the records demanded, it may impose reasonable restrictions on the use or distribution of the records by the demanding member.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-1605.
Limitations on use of membership list.

Without consent of the board, a membership list or any part thereof may not be obtained or used by any person for any purpose unrelated to a member’s interest as a member. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, without the consent of the board a membership list or any part thereof may not be:

Used to solicit money or property unless the money or property will be used solely to solicit the votes of the members in an election to be held by the corporation;

Used for any commercial purpose; or

Sold to or purchased by any person.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.